North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 2. Foot and Mouth Disease; Rinderpest; Fowl Pest; Newcastle Disease.

§ 106-308.
Appropriation to combat animal and fowl diseases.

If the foot and mouth disease, rinderpest (cattle plague), fowl pest, or Newcastle disease (Asiatic or European types), or any other type of foreign infectious disease which may become a menace to livestock and poultry and so declared to be by the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, Chief of the United States Bureau of Animal Industry and the Commissioner of Agriculture of North Carolina, seem likely to appear in this State and an emergency as to such disease or diseases is declared by the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, or his authorized agents, and the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services has no funds available to immediately meet the situation in cooperation with the United States Department of Agriculture, the Director of the Budget, upon approval of the Governor and Council of State, shall set aside, appropriate and make available out of the Contingency and Emergency Fund such sum as the Governor and Council of State shall deem proper and necessary, and the Budget Bureau shall place said funds in an account to be known as the Animal and Fowl Disease Appropriation and make same available to the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, to be used by the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services in the work of preventing or eradicating the above diseases, or any of them. Funds from the above appropriation shall be paid only for work in this connection upon warrants approved by the Commissioner of Agriculture. The provisions of Part 4 of Article 34 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes relating to the compensation for killing diseased animals shall be applicable to animals infected with or exposed to the diseases named and described in this section, as well as to the destruction of material contaminated by or exposed to the diseases described in this section, as well as the necessary cost of the disinfection of materials. In no event shall any of the above appropriation be spent for the purposes set forth in this section unless the funds appropriated by this State are matched in an equal amount by the federal government or one of its agencies to be spent for the same purposes.

History.

1915, c. 160, s. 1; C.S., s. 4875; 1951, c. 799; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-309.
Disposition of surplus funds.

If said disease shall have appeared and shall have been eradicated and work is no longer necessary in connection with it, the State Treasurer shall return such part of the appropriation as is not expended to the general fund, and the Commissioner of Agriculture shall furnish the Governor an itemized statement of the money expended, and all moneys set aside out of the State funds and used for the purpose of eradicating said disease under the provisions of this Article shall be paid back to the State funds by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services out of the first funds received by said agricultural Department available for such purpose.

History.

1915, c. 160, s. 2; C.S., s. 4876; 1997-261, s. 109.